Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2729
Payroll processing services.

(1) A licensee that provides payroll processing services shall:

(a) Issue reports to clients detailing client payroll obligations in advance of the payroll funds being deducted from an account; and

(b) Make available employee paystubs or an equivalent statement to employees.

(2) This section does not apply to a licensee providing payroll processing services where the licensee's client designates the intended recipients to the licensee and is responsible for providing the disclosures required by subdivision (1)(b) of this section.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 29;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 54;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 34.